Nebraska, session 109, LB506.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB506 LB506
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Landlord and Tenant Radon Awareness Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Landlord and Tenant Radon Awareness
Act:
(1) Dwelling unit means a structure or the part of a structure that
is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person who
maintains a household or by two or more persons who maintain a common
household;
(2) Lease means an oral or written agreement under which a lessor
allows a tenant to use a dwelling unit for a specified rent and period of
time;
(3) Lessor means any person or entity that leases a dwelling unit to
a tenant. The term includes, but is not limited to, an individual,
company, corporation, firm, group, association, partnership, joint
venture, trust, government agency, or subdivision thereof;
(4) Mitigation means measures designed to permanently reduce indoor
radon concentrations;
(5) Radon means a gaseous radioactive decay product of uranium or
thorium;
(6) Radon hazard means exposure to indoor radon concentrations at or
in excess of four picocuries per liter of air;
(7) Radon measurement specialist means an individual licensed as a
radon measurement specialist under the Radiation Control Act;
(8) Radon mitigation specialist means an individual licensed as a
radon mitigation specialist under the Radiation Control Act; and
(9) Tenant means a person who has entered into an oral or written
lease with a lessor to lease a dwelling unit.
Sec. 3. (1) At the time of a prospective tenant's application to
lease a dwelling unit and at any time during the leasing period if
requested by the tenant, the lessor shall provide the prospective tenant
or tenant of a dwelling unit with:
-2-

LB506 LB506
2025 2025
(a) Copies of any records or reports pertaining to radon
concentrations within the dwelling unit that indicate a radon hazard to
the tenant; and
(b) The disclosure form described in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) A tenant may conduct his or her own radon test of the dwelling
unit at any time during the leasing period. The tenant shall provide the
lessor with copies of the results, including any records or reports
pertaining to radon concentrations, within ten days after receiving the
results. If the tenant's radon test indicates a radon hazard, the lessor
may hire a radon measurement specialist to perform an additional test
within thirty days after receipt of the tenant's radon test results. The
results of a measurement by a radon measurement specialist may be used by
the lessor to disprove the presence of a radon hazard. Test results are
valid for a period of two years from the date of testing unless any
renovations, additions, or modifications are made to the building. If the
lessor declines to dispute the results of the tenant's radon test showing
a radon hazard or elects not to mitigate the radon hazard, the tenant
may:
(a) If within the first ninety days of the lease agreement,
terminate the lease without penalty or loss of security deposit; or
(b) At any time during the leasing period, hire a radon mitigation
specialist to perform radon mitigation activities at the tenant's own
expense. With express consent from the lessor, the cost of such
activities may be deducted from the cost of the tenant's rent in equal
parts for the remainder of the leasing period.
(3) If a lessor fails to provide the prospective tenant or tenant
with the documents required in subsection (1) of this section, then the
tenant may, after having his or her own radon test conducted which shows
a radon hazard in the dwelling unit, terminate the lease without penalty
or loss of security deposit. The tenant shall provide the lessor with
copies of the results of the test, including any records or reports
-3-

LB506 LB506
2025 2025
pertaining to radon concentrations, within ten days after receiving the
results of the test.
(4) The following disclosure form shall be provided to each tenant
of a dwelling unit in accordance with subsection (1) of this section:
DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION ON RADON HAZARDS TO TENANTS
Each tenant in this dwelling unit is notified that the property may
present exposure to levels of indoor radon gas that may place the
occupants at risk of developing radon-induced lung cancer. Radon is the
leading cause of death in private homes and the leading cause of lung
cancer in nonsmokers. The lessor of any dwelling unit is required to
provide each tenant with any information on radon test results of the
dwelling unit that present a radon hazard to the tenant.
The State of Nebraska strongly recommends that all rental properties
have a radon test performed and radon hazards mitigated if elevated
levels are found in a dwelling unit. Elevated radon concentrations can
easily be reduced by a radon mitigation specialist.
Dwelling Unit Address: ...........
Lessor's Disclosure (initial each of the following that apply)
........... Lessor has no knowledge of elevated radon concentrations
(or records or reports pertaining to elevated radon concentrations) in
the dwelling unit.
........... Radon concentrations at or above four picocuries per
liter of air are known to be present within the dwelling unit.
........... Lessor has provided the tenant with copies of all
available records and reports, if any, pertaining to radon concentrations
within the dwelling unit.
Tenant's Acknowledgment (initial if the following applies)
........... Tenant has received copies of all information listed
above.
Certification of Accuracy
The following parties have reviewed the information above and each
-4-

LB506 LB506
2025 2025
party certifies, to the best of his or her knowledge, that the
information he or she provided is true and accurate.
Lessor ........... Date ..........
Tenant ........... Date ..........
(5) Nothing in this section is intended to or shall be construed to
imply an obligation of a lessor or tenant to conduct any radon testing
activity or to perform any radon mitigation activity.
Sec. 4. A lessor of a dwelling unit vacated by a tenant under
section 3 of this act who has received a security deposit from the tenant
to secure the payment of rent or to compensate for damage to the leased
property may not withhold any part of that security deposit as
compensation for radon testing or mitigation activities. However, the
lessor may withhold part of the security deposit if the tenant had a
mitigation system installed without the lessor's consent and the system
was not properly installed by a radon mitigation specialist. An itemized
statement shall be provided to the tenant if any part of the security
deposit is withheld.
Sec. 5. The Landlord and Tenant Radon Awareness Act applies to
leases entered into on or after the effective date of this act.
-5-